Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1045.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 9-500.42, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE9-500.42. Prohibitions; blockchain technology; state preemption; definitions A. A city or town may not prohibit or otherwise restrict an individual from lawfully accessing or using computational power or running a node on blockchain technology in a residence. b. A city or town may not impose a tax or fee on any person for running a node on blockchain technology in a residence.  This section does not apply to a tax levied pursuant to section 42-6012. B. c. The regulation of the act of lawfully accessing or using computational power or running a node on blockchain technology in a residence and the imposition of a tax or fee on a person that runs a node on blockchain technology in a residence is of statewide concern and not subject to further regulation by a city or town. C. d. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Blockchain technology" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-7061. 1. 2. "Computational power" means the use of computer hardware and software to process data, run algorithms or perform tasks requiring significant computing resources, including artificial intelligence, blockchain, scientific research and cloud computing. 2. 3. "Running a node on blockchain technology" means providing computing power to validate or encrypt transactions in blockchain technology as defined in section 44-7061. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 11-269.22, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE11-269.22. Prohibitions; blockchain technology; state preemption; definitions A. A county may not prohibit or otherwise restrict an individual from lawfully accessing or using computational power or running a node on blockchain technology in a residence. b. A county may not impose a tax or fee on any person for running a node on blockchain technology in a residence. This section does not apply to a tax levied pursuant to section 42-6012. B. c. The regulation of the act of lawfully accessing or using computational power or running a node on blockchain technology in a residence and the imposition of a tax or fee on a person that runs a node on blockchain technology in a residence is of statewide concern and not subject to further regulation by a county. C. d. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Blockchain technology" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-7061. 1. 2. "Computational power" means the use of computer hardware and software to process data, run algorithms or perform tasks requiring significant computing resources, including artificial intelligence, blockchain, scientific research and cloud computing. 2. 3. "Running a node on blockchain technology" means providing computing power to validate or encrypt transactions in blockchain technology as defined in section 44-7061. END_STATUTE